Washington statutes.
RCW 3.34.070

District judges—Term of office.

Every district judge shall hold office for a term of four years from and after the second Monday in January next succeeding his or her selection and continuing until a successor is elected and qualified.

[ 1984 c 258 s 13; 1961 c 299 s 16.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.